Utah statutes.
31A-27a-113.   Executory contracts.
(1)  Subject to the other provisions of this section, the receiver may assume
or reject an executory contract or unexpired lease of the insurer.
(2) (a)  If there is a default in an executory contract or unexpired lease of
the insurer, the receiver may not assume the contract or lease unless, at the
time of the assumption of the contract or lease, the receiver:
(i)  cures or provides adequate assurance that the receiver will promptly cure
the default; and
(ii)  provides adequate assurance of future performance under the contract or
lease.
(b)  This Subsection (2) does not apply to a default that is a breach of a
provision relating to:
(i)  the insolvency or financial condition of the insurer at any time before
the closing of the delinquency proceeding;
(ii)  the appointment of or taking possession by:
(A)  a receiver in a case under this chapter; or
(B)  a custodian before the commencement of the delinquency proceeding; or
(iii)  the satisfaction of a penalty rate or provision relating to a default
arising from a failure of the insurer to perform a nonmonetary obligation
under the executory contract or unexpired lease.
(3)  A claim arising from a rejection under this section or under a plan of
rehabilitation or liquidation of an executory contract or unexpired lease of
the insurer that is not assumed shall be determined, and shall be treated and
classified as though the claim arose before the day on which a successful
petition commencing the delinquency proceeding is filed.
